Tennessee, session 114, SB1547.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-247(a), is amended by deleting
subdivision (53).
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 4-29-251(a), is amended by inserting
the following as a new subdivision:
( ) State university and community college system, board of regents, created by
§§ 49-8-101 and 49-8-201;
SECTION 3. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1547
010105
- 1 -